Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1681YC (2) 91 nls/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 525.1 Financial institutions ââ 1 unfair practices. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âConsumer reportâ means the same as defined in the 5 federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Â§1681a. 6 b. âFinancial institutionâ means the same as defined in 7 section 527.2, and includes a mortgage broker licensed under 8 chapter 535B, a lender of mortgage loans or consumer loans, and 9 any other person that engages in the business of lending money 10 in the state. 11 c. (1) âMortgage trigger leadâ means a consumer report 12 obtained pursuant to the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 13 U.S.C. Â§1681b, where the issuance of the consumer report is 14 triggered by an inquiry made with a consumer reporting agency 15 in response to an application for credit. 16 (2) âMortgage trigger leadâ does not include a consumer 17 report on an applicant obtained by a financial institution 18 with which the applicant has initially applied for credit, or 19 a financial institution that holds or services an existing 20 extension of credit of the applicant who is the subject of the 21 consumer report. 22 2. A financial institution shall not use an unfair or 23 deceptive practice when using prescreened mortgage trigger 24 lead information derived from a consumer report to solicit a 25 consumer who has applied for a loan with a different financial 26 institution. A financial institution shall be deemed to have 27 engaged in an unfair or deceptive practice if the financial 28 institution does any of the following: 29 a. In an initial phase of a solicitation from a lender 30 or loan broker, the financial institution fails to clearly 31 and conspicuously state that the financial institution is 32 not affiliated with the financial institution with which the 33 consumer initially applied. 34 b. In an initial solicitation, the financial institution 35 -1- LSB 1681YC (2) 91 nls/ko 1/ 3 H.F. _____ fails to conform to state and federal law relating to 1 prescreened solicitations using consumer reports, including but 2 not limited to the requirement to make a firm offer of credit 3 to the consumer. 4 c. The financial institution uses information regarding a 5 consumer who has opted out of prescreened offers of credit or 6 who has placed the consumerâs contact information on a federal 7 do-not-call registry. 8 d. The financial institution solicits a consumer with an 9 offer of certain rates, terms, or costs, but subsequently 10 changes the rates, terms, or costs to the detriment of the 11 consumer. 12 3. A violation of this section shall constitute an unlawful 13 practice under section 714.16. 14 Sec. 2. Section 714.16, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 15 by adding the following new paragraph: 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. It shall be an unlawful practice for a 17 financial institution to violate section 525.1. 18